Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2922.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-2409, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2409. Obstructing criminal investigations or prosecutions; classification; exemption A. A person who knowingly attempts by means of bribery, misrepresentation, intimidation or force or threats of force to obstruct, delay or prevent the communication of information or testimony relating to a violation of any criminal statute to a peace officer, magistrate, prosecutor or grand jury or who knowingly injures another in his person or property on account of the giving by the latter or by any other person of any such information or testimony to a peace officer, magistrate, prosecutor or grand jury is guilty of a class 5 felony, except that it is a class 3 felony if the person commits the offense with the intent to promote, further or assist a criminal street gang. B. This section does not apply to the owner of a residential property who refuses to open a door to the property for a peace officer.END_STATUTE